New Jersey, session 222, S2473.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Notwithstanding any law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, a bidder shall be ineligible to receive a new State contract if the bidder has failed to perform the work under an existing State contract, as determined by the State Contract Manager for the existing contract pursuant to section 7 of P.L.2005, c.336 (C.52:34-10.7), or if the existing State contract is on hold, incomplete, or undergoing litigation involving the bidders performance or nonperformance of the contract. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.